Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5799HV (2) 91 ss/ko H.F. 2504 Section 1. Section 126.22, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Unlawful distribution. 3 a. Any person who distributes nitrous oxide, or possesses 4 nitrous oxide with intent to distribute to any other person, 5 if such distribution is with the intent to induce unlawful 6 inhaling of the substance or is with the knowledge that the 7 other person will unlawfully inhale the substance, is guilty of 8 a serious misdemeanor. 9 b. The distribution of, or possession with intent to 10 distribute, nitrous oxide by a place of business or retailer, 11 as defined in section 453A.1, creates a rebuttable presumption 12 that the place of business or retailer distributes or possesses 13 nitrous oxide in violation of paragraph âaâ . 14